Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF892.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2230HV (2) 91 sb/js H.F. 892 Section 1. Section 483A.24, subsection 2, paragraph a, 1 subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (a), Code 2025, is 2 amended to read as follows: 3 (a) (i) Are in tracts of two or more contiguous acres for 4 parcels for which subparagraph subdivision (ii) does not apply . 5 (ii) Are in tracts of twenty or more contiguous acres for 6 parcels bought on or after January 11, 2027. 7